California statutes. Civil Code
-------------------------------------------

799.59.

When the management removes or causes the removal of a defaulting occupant’s recreational vehicle, the management and the individual or entity that removes the recreational vehicle shall exercise reasonable and ordinary care in removing the recreational vehicle to the storage area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Defaulting Tenants [799.65. - 799.67.]

799.65.

The management may terminate the tenancy of a defaulting tenant for nonpayment of rent, utilities, or reasonable incidental service charges, provided the amount due shall have been unpaid for a period of five days from its due date, and provided the tenant has been given a three-day written notice subsequent to that five-day period to pay the total amount due or to vacate the park. For purposes of this section, the five-day period does not include the date the payment is due. The three-day notice shall be given to the tenant in the manner prescribed by
 Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Any payment of the total charges due, prior to the expiration of the three-day period, shall cure any default of the tenant. In the event the tenant does not pay prior to the expiration of the three-day notice period, the tenant shall remain liable for all payments due up until the time the tenancy is vacated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.66.

The management may terminate or refuse to renew the right of occupancy of a tenant for other than nonpayment of rent or other charges upon the giving of a written notice to the tenant in the manner prescribed by Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure to remove the recreational vehicle from the park. The notice need not state the cause for termination but shall provide not less than 30 days’ notice of termination of the tenancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

799.67.

Evictions pursuant to this article shall be subject to the requirements set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Defaulting Residents [799.70. - 799.71.]

799.70.

The management may terminate or refuse to renew the right of occupancy of a defaulting resident upon the giving of a written notice to the defaulting resident in the manner prescribed by Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure to remove the recreational vehicle from the park. This notice shall provide not less than 60 days’ notice of termination of the right of occupancy and shall specify one of the following reasons for the termination of the right of occupancy:

(a) Nonpayment of rent,
 utilities, or reasonable incidental service charges; provided, that the amount due has been unpaid for a period of five days from its due date, and provided that the resident shall be given a three-day written notice subsequent to that five-day period to pay the total amount due or to vacate the park. For purposes of this subdivision, the five-day period does not include the date the payment is due. The three-day notice shall be given to the resident in the manner prescribed by Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The three-day notice may be given at the same time as the 60-day notice required for termination of the right of occupancy; provided, however, that any payment of the total charges due, prior to the expiration of the three-day period, shall cure any default of the resident. In the event the resident does not pay prior to the expiration of the three-day notice period, the resident shall remain liable for all payments due up until the time the tenancy is vacated.

(b) Failure of the resident to comply with a local ordinance or state law or regulation relating to the recreational vehicle park or recreational vehicles within a reasonable time after the resident or the management receives a notice of noncompliance from the appropriate governmental agency and the resident has been provided with a copy of that notice.

(c) Conduct by the resident or guest, upon the park premises, which constitutes a substantial annoyance to other occupants, tenants, or residents.

(d) Conviction of the resident of prostitution, or a felony controlled substance offense, if the act resulting in the conviction was committed anywhere on the premises of the park, including, but not limited to, within the resident’s recreational vehicle.

However, the right of
 occupancy may not be terminated for the reason specified in this subdivision if the person convicted of the offense has permanently vacated, and does not subsequently reoccupy, the recreational vehicle.

(e) Failure of the resident or a guest to comply with a rule or regulation of the park which is part of the rental agreement or any amendment thereto.

No act or omission of the resident or guest shall constitute a failure to comply with a rule or regulation unless the resident has been notified in writing of the violation and has failed to correct the violation within seven days of the issuance of the written notification.

(f) Condemnation of the park.

(g) Change of use of the park or any portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.71.

Evictions pursuant to this article shall be subject to the requirements set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Liens for Recreational Vehicles and Abandoned Possessions [799.75. - 799.75.]

799.75.

The management shall have a lien upon the recreational vehicle and the contents therein for the proper charges due from a defaulting occupant, tenant, or resident. Such a lien shall be identical to that authorized by Section 1861, and shall be enforced as provided by Sections 1861 to 1861.28, inclusive. Disposition of any possessions abandoned by an occupant, tenant, or resident at a park shall be performed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1980) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Proceedings [799.78. - 799.79.]

799.78.

In any action arising out of the provisions of this chapter, the prevailing party shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. A party shall be deemed a prevailing party for the purposes of this section if the judgment is rendered in his or her favor or where the litigation is dismissed in his or her favor prior to or during the trial, unless the parties otherwise agree in the settlement or compromise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.79.

In the event that an occupant, tenant, or resident or a former occupant, tenant, or resident is the prevailing party in a civil action against the management to enforce his or her rights under this chapter, the occupant, tenant, or resident, in addition to damages afforded by law, may, in the discretion of the court, be awarded an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each willful violation of any provision of this chapter by the management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.7. Floating Home Residency Law [800. - 800.306.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [800. - 800.9.]

800.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Floating Home Residency Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.1.

Unless the provisions or context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.2.

“Management” means the owner of a floating home marina or an agent or representative authorized to act on his or her behalf in connection with matters relating to a tenancy in the floating home marina.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.3.

“Floating home” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 18075.55 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.4.

“Floating home marina” means an area where five or more floating home berths are rented, or held out for rent, to accommodate floating homes, but does not include a marina or harbor that satisfies all of the following:

(a) The marina or harbor is managed by a nonprofit organization, the property, assets, and profits of which may not inure to any individual or group of individuals, but only to another nonprofit organization.

(b) The rules and regulations of the marina or harbor are set by majority vote of the berthholders thereof.

(c) The marina or harbor contains berths for fewer than 25 floating
 homes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.   (AB 252)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

800.5.

“Rental agreement” means an agreement between the management and the homeowner establishing the terms and conditions of a tenancy. A lease is a rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.6.

“Homeowner” means a person who owns or resides in a floating home which is in a floating home marina pursuant to a rental agreement with management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.7.

“Change of use” means a use of the floating home marina for a purpose other than the rental, or the holding out for rent, of five or more floating home berths, and does not mean the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a floating home marina rule or regulation. A change of use may affect an entire floating home marina or any portion thereof. “Change of use” includes, but is not limited to, a change of the floating home marina or any portion thereof to a condominium, stock cooperative, or any form of ownership wherein spaces within the floating home marina are to be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.8.

“Resident” means a homeowner or other person who lawfully occupies a floating home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.9.

“Tenancy” means the right of a homeowner to the use of a berth within a floating home marina on which to locate, maintain, and occupy a floating home, and accessory structures or vessels, including the use of the services and facilities of the floating home marina.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rental Agreement [800.20. - 800.26.]

800.20.

Unless otherwise provided, the management shall make available to floating homeowners, upon request, copies of all notices required by this article and Article 3 (commencing with Section 800.30).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.21.

The rental agreement shall be in writing and shall contain, in addition to the provisions otherwise required by law to be included, all of the following:

(a) The term of the tenancy and the rent therefor.

(b) The rules and regulations of the floating home marina.

(c) A reference to this chapter and a statement that a copy of it is available from the marina upon request.

(d) A provision
 specifying that it is the responsibility of the management to provide and maintain physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order and condition.

(e) A description of the physical improvements to be provided the homeowner during his or her tenancy.

(f) A provision listing those services which will be provided at the time the rental agreement is executed and will continue to be offered for the term of tenancy and the fees, if any, to be charged for those services.

(g) All other provisions governing the tenancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.22.

The rental agreement may include other provisions permitted by law, but need not include specific language contained in state or local laws not a part of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.23.

(a) A homeowner shall be offered a rental agreement for (1) a term of 12 months, (2) a lesser period as mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and the management, (3) a longer period as mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and the management, or (4) a longer period as necessary to secure financing from a conventional lending institution.

(b) Rental agreements for a prescribed term shall not contain any terms or conditions with respect to charges for rent, utilities, or incidental reasonable service charges that would be different during the first 12
 months of the agreement from the corresponding terms or conditions that would be offered to the homeowner or homeowners on a month-to-month basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.24.

No rental agreement for a floating home berth shall contain a provision by which the homeowner waives his or her rights under any of the provisions of this chapter. Any waiver of these rights shall be deemed contrary to public policy and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.25.

(a) Membership in any private club or organization that is a condition for tenancy in a floating home marina shall not be denied on any basis listed in subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 12955 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926, 12926.1, subdivision (m) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 12955, and Section 12955.2 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to familial status, subdivision (a) shall not be construed to apply to housing for older persons, as defined in Section 12955.9 of the Government Code. With respect to familial status, nothing in subdivision (a) shall be construed to affect Sections 51.2, 51.3, 51.4, 51.10, 51.11, and 799.5, relating to housing for senior citizens. Subdivision (d) of Section 51 and Section 4760 of this code and subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) of Section 12955 of the Government Code shall apply to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 28.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

800.26.

On or before March 12, 1991, the management shall notify all floating homeowners, in writing, that a copy of the Floating Home Residency Law is available to them, upon request, from the management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rules and Regulations [800.30. - 800.37.]

800.30.

Each common area facility shall be open or available to residents at all reasonable hours, and the hours of the common area facility shall be posted at the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.31.

A rule or regulation of the floating home marina may be amended at any time with the consent of a homeowner, or without his or her consent upon written notice to him or her of not less than six months. Written notice to a new homeowner, whose tenancy commences within the required period of notice, of a proposed amendment shall constitute compliance with this section where the written notice is given to him or her before the inception of his or her tenancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.32.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the ownership or management of a floating home marina, cooperative, or condominium for floating homes shall have no right of entry to a floating home without the prior written consent of the resident. This consent may be revoked in writing by the resident at any time. The ownership or management shall have a right of entry into the berth in which a floating home is situated for correction of what management determines to be a hazardous condition at any time, or for maintenance of utilities, docks, and common areas at any
 reasonable time, but not in a manner or at a time which would interfere with the resident’s quiet enjoyment.

(b) The ownership or management of a floating home marina, cooperative, or condominium may enter a floating home without the prior written consent of the resident in case of an emergency or when the resident has abandoned the floating home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.33.

(a) The management shall give written notice to all homeowners and prospective homeowners concerning the following matters: (1) the nature of the zoning or use permit under which the floating home marina operates, (2) if the floating home marina is operating pursuant to a permit subject to a renewal or expiration date, the relevant information and dates shall be included in the notice, and (3) the duration of any lease of the floating home marina, or any portion thereof, in which the management is a lessee.

(b) If a change occurs concerning the zoning or use permit
 under which the floating home marina operates, a change occurs to the lease under which the management is a lessee and that change could affect the homeowner, including the termination of the lease, litigation occurs regarding termination of the lease, or expiration of a use permit occurs, all homeowners shall be given written notice at least 30 days prior to the effective date of the change. Notification regarding the change of use of the floating home marina, or any portion thereof, shall be governed by subdivision (f) of Section 800.71. A prospective homeowner shall be notified prior to the inception of the tenancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.34.

The management of a floating home marina shall disclose, in writing, the name and address of the floating home marina owner upon the request of a homeowner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

800.35.

(a) The management of a floating home marina may enter a floating home, which is owned by the marina, only upon the prior written consent of the renter, except: 

(1) In case of an emergency. 

(2) Upon reasonable notice and during regular business hours, to make necessary or agreed repairs. 

(3) When the homeowner has abandoned the premises. 

(4) Pursuant to court order.
 

(b) The management of a floating home marina may enter a floating home, not owned by the marina, only upon prior written consent, except: 

(1) In case of an emergency. 

(2) When the homeowner has abandoned the premises. 

(3) Pursuant to a court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

800.36.

(a) A floating home not owned by a floating home marina shall be deemed abandoned by the homeowner, and the lease shall terminate, if the floating home marina gives written notice of its belief of abandonment as provided in this section and the homeowner fails to give the marina written notice, prior to the date of termination specified in the marina’s notice, stating that he or she does not intend to abandon the floating home and stating an address at which the homeowner may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the marina. 

(b) The
 marina may give a notice of belief of abandonment to the homeowner pursuant to this section only where the rent on the marina has been due and unpaid for at least 45 consecutive days and the marina management reasonably believes that the homeowner has abandoned the floating home. The date of termination of the lease shall be specified in the marina’s notice and shall be not less than 15 days after the notice is served personally or, if mailed, not less than 18 days after the notice is deposited in the mail. 

(c) The marina’s notice of belief of abandonment shall be personally delivered to the homeowner or sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the homeowner at his or her last known address and, if there is reason to believe that the notice sent to that address will not be received by the homeowner, also to such other address, if any, known to the marina where the homeowner may reasonably be expected to receive the notice.

(d) The notice of belief of abandonment shall be in substantially the following form:

Notice of Belief of AbandonmentTo:(Name of homeowner)(Address of homeowner)This notice is given pursuant to Section 800.36 of the Civil Code concerning the floating home marina
 leased by you at ________ (state location of the property by address or other sufficient description). The rent on this marina has been due and unpaid for 45 consecutive days and the marina believes that you have abandoned the floating home. 

The floating home will be deemed abandoned within the meaning of Section 1951.2 of the Civil Code and your lease will terminate on ____ (here insert a date not less than 15 days after this notice is served personally or, if mailed, not less than 18 days after this notice is deposited in the mail) unless before that date the undersigned receives at the address indicated below a written notice from you stating both of the following: 

(1) Your intent not to abandon the floating home. 

(2) An address at which you may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the floating home
 marina. 

You are required to pay the rent due and unpaid on this marina as required by the lease, and your failure to do so can lead to a court proceeding against you. 
Dated: ________________________________
(Signature of marina manager / owner)(Type or print name of marina manager / owner)(Address to which the homeowner is to send notice)(e) The floating home shall not be deemed to be abandoned pursuant to this section if the homeowner proves any of the following: 

(1) At the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given, the rent was not due and unpaid for 45 consecutive days. 

(2) At the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given, it was not reasonable for the marina to believe that the homeowner had abandoned the floating home. The fact that the marina management knew that the homeowner left personal property on the floating home does not, of itself, justify a finding that the marina management did not reasonably believe that the homeowner had abandoned the floating home. 

(3) Prior to the date specified in the marina’s notice, the homeowner gave written notice to the lessor stating his or her intent not to abandon the floating home and stating an address at which he or she may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the marina. 

(4) During the period commencing 45 days before the time the notice of belief of abandonment was given and ending on the date the lease would have terminated pursuant to the notice, the homeowner paid to the marina all or a portion of the rent due and unpaid.

(f) Nothing in this section precludes the marina or the homeowner from otherwise proving that the floating home has been abandoned by the homeowner within the meaning of Section 1951.2. 

(g) Nothing in this section precludes the marina from serving a notice
 requiring the homeowner to pay rent or quit as provided in Section 800.71 at any time permitted by that section, or affects the time and manner of giving any other notice required or permitted by law. The giving of the notice provided by this section does not satisfy the requirements of Sections 1161 and 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

800.37.

A floating home which is owned by a floating home marina shall be deemed abandoned according to the procedures and requirements of Section 1951.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fees and Charges [800.40. - 800.50.]

800.40.

The management shall give a homeowner written notice of any increase in his or her rent at least 30 days before the date of the increase, and the reason for the increase, including the basis for any calculation used in determining the amount of the increase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

800.40.5.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (b), management shall not, over the course of any 12-month period, increase the gross rental rate for a tenancy for a floating home berth in a floating home marina more than 3 percent plus the percentage change in the cost of living, or 5 percent, whichever is lower, of the lowest gross rental rate charged for a tenancy at any time during the 12 months prior to the effective date of the increase.

(2) If the same homeowner maintains a tenancy over any 12-month period, the gross rental rate for the tenancy shall not be increased in more than two increments over that 12-month period, subject to the other restrictions of this subdivision governing gross rental rate increases.

(b) (1) For a new tenancy in which no homeowner from the prior tenancy remains in lawful possession of the floating home berth, management may establish the initial rental rate not subject to subdivision (a). However, if the applicable local agency or jurisdiction has adopted an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that limits the allowable rental rate for a new tenancy, that ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure shall apply. Subdivision (a) shall be applicable to subsequent increases after the initial rental rate has been established, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), management shall not impose an increase in rent on a homeowner that purchases a floating home if the purchase qualifies as an in-place transfer, and the initial rental rate shall be set at the rental rate of the previous
 tenancy. Subdivision (a) shall be applicable to subsequent increases after the initial rental rate has been established.

(c) Management shall provide notice of any increase in the rental rate, pursuant to subdivision (a), to each homeowner in accordance with Section 800.40.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a tenancy for any of the following:

(1) A floating home berth restricted by deed, regulatory restriction contained in an agreement with a government agency, or other recorded document as affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, or subject to an agreement that provides housing subsidies for affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health
 and Safety Code or comparable federal statutes.

(2) A floating home berth subject to any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that restricts annual increases in the rental rate to an amount less than that provided in subdivision (a).

(e) (1) This section shall apply to all rent increases occurring on or after January 1, 2022.

(2) In the event that management has increased the rent by more than the amount permissible under subdivision (a) between January 1, 2022, and January 1, 2023, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The applicable rent on January 1, 2023, shall be the rent as of January 1, 2022, plus the maximum permissible increase under subdivision (a).

(B) Management shall not be liable to a homeowner for any corresponding rent overpayment.

(f) Any waiver of the rights under this section shall be void as contrary to public policy.

(g) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items” means the
 CPI-U for the San Francisco-Oakland-Hayward metropolitan area, or any successor metropolitan area index.

(2) (A) “Percentage change in the cost of living” means the percentage change in the applicable CPI-U, as described in paragraph (1) and computed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.

(B) (i) For rent increases that take effect before August 1 of any calendar year, the following shall apply:

(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of the immediately preceding calendar year and April of the year before that.

(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in
 the amount published for March of the immediately preceding calendar year and March of the year before that.

(ii) For rent increases that take effect on or after August 1 of any calendar year, the following shall apply:

(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of that calendar year and April of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for March of that calendar year and March of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(iii) The percentage change shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent.

(3) “In place transfer” means the sale of a floating home where the floating home is transferred by a homeowner to a subsequent homeowner and remains docked at the same berth.

(h) (1) Nothing in this section affects the authority of a local government to adopt or maintain an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that may be charged for rent or the rental rate for a new tenancy, including any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure adopted before the effective date of this section. However, if a local ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure allows for the rental rate for a new tenancy or a rental rate increase greater than that provided in subdivision (a), this section shall apply.

(2) This section is not intended to express any
 policy regarding the appropriate, allowable rental rate increase limitations imposed by ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure regulating rent increases adopted before or after the effective date of this section.

(i) This section shall only apply to floating home marinas in the following counties:

(1) The County of Alameda.

(2) The County of Contra Costa.

(3) The County of Marin, until Section 800.40.6 becomes operative.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that
 date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   (AB 754)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

800.40.6.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items” or “CPI-U” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items for the San Francisco-Oakland-Hayward metropolitan area, or any successor metropolitan area index.

(2) (A) “Percentage change in the cost of living” means the percentage change in the applicable CPI-U, as described in paragraph (1) and computed pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) (i) For rent increases that take effect before August 1 of any calendar year, both
 of the following shall apply:

(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of the immediately preceding calendar year and April of the year before that.

(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for March of the immediately preceding calendar year and March of the year before that.

(ii) For rent increases that take effect on or after August 1 of any calendar year, both of the following shall apply:

(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of that calendar year and April of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for March of that calendar year and March of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(iii) The percentage change shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent.

(3) “In place transfer” means the sale of a floating home where the floating home is transferred by a homeowner to a subsequent homeowner and remains docked at the same berth.

(b) (1) Except as provided by this subdivision, management shall not, over the course of any 12-month period, increase the gross rental rate for a tenancy for a floating home berth in a floating home marina more than the percent change
 in the cost of living. If the gross rental rate is increased, the increase shall be a minimum of 3 percent and a maximum of 7.5 percent.

(2) If the annual percent change in the cost of living exceeds 5 percent, only one-half of the percent change in cost of living that is in excess of 5 percent may be used to increase the gross rental rate up to the maximum allowable increase of 7.5 percent.

(3) (A) This subdivision shall apply to all rent increases occurring on or after July 1, 2025.

(B) In the event that management has increased the rent by more than the amount permissible under this subdivision between July 1, 2025, and January 1, 2026, both of the following shall apply:

(i) The applicable rent on January 1, 2026, shall be the
 rent as of July 1, 2025, plus the maximum permissible increase under this subdivision.

(ii) Management shall not be liable to a homeowner for any corresponding rent overpayment.

(4) Management shall provide notice of any increase in the rental rate, pursuant to this subdivision, to each homeowner in accordance with Section 800.40.

(c) (1) In the event a qualifying in-place transfer of a floating home involves the sale of a floating home either subject to an existing lease with a 10-year or longer term or that was offered a lease with a 10-year or longer term between two years and six months prior to the time of the home sale, management may establish a new initial rental rate for a prospective homeowner consistent with the following requirements:

(A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B), the new initial rental rate shall not exceed the lesser of either of the following:

(i) A 25-percent increase over the rental rate prior to the sale.

(ii) Fifteen-hundredths of 1 percent of the sale price of the home.

(B) If the formula described in subparagraph (A) results in a new initial rental rate that is less than a 3-percent increase over the rental rate immediately prior to the time of the home sale, the new initial rental rate shall not exceed the rental rate immediately prior to the time of the home sale plus the most recent percent change in the cost of living, which shall be a minimum increase of 3 percent and a maximum increase of 5 percent.

(C) The final sale price of the home provided to the marina owner shall be certified and substantiated in writing by the buyer to be true under penalty of perjury, as defined in Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(D) Lease terms offered after an in-place transfer shall be at least 10 years.

(E) In the event a floating home sold pursuant to this subdivision is sold again within five years, the new total monthly initial rental rate shall not exceed the lesser of either of the following:

(i) A 15-percent increase over the rent prior to the sale.

(ii) Fifteen-hundredths of 1 percent of the sale price of the home.

(2) Notwithstanding the limitations described in
 paragraph (1), this subdivision shall additionally apply to all in-place transfers occurring between July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, regardless of whether the floating home was subject to an existing lease with a 10-year or longer term or was offered a lease with a 10-year or longer term between two years and six months prior to the time of the home sale.

(d) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not apply to a tenancy for any of the following:

(1) A floating home berth restricted by deed, regulatory restriction contained in an agreement with a government agency, or other recorded document as affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, or subject to an agreement that provides housing subsidies for affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate
 income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code or comparable federal statutes.

(2) A floating home berth subject to any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that allows annual increases in the rental rate up to an amount less than that provided in subdivision (b) or (c).

(e) Any waiver of the rights under this section shall be void as contrary to public policy.

(f) (1) Nothing in this section affects the authority of a local government to adopt or maintain an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that may be charged for rent or the rental rate for a new tenancy, including any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure adopted before the effective date of this section. However, if a local ordinance, rule,
 regulation, or initiative measure allows for the rental rate for a new tenancy or a rental rate increase greater than that provided in subdivision (b) or (c), this section shall apply.

(2) This section is not intended to express any policy regarding the appropriate, allowable rental rate increase limitations imposed by ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure regulating rent increases adopted before or after the effective date of this section.

(g) This section shall apply only to floating home marinas in the County of Marin.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2038, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 498, Sec. 2.   (AB 754)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2038, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

800.41.

(a) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for other than rent, utilities, and incidental reasonable charges for services actually rendered.

(b) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for obtaining a rental agreement on a floating home berth for (1) a term of 12 months, or (2) a lesser period as mutually agreed